Washington statutes.
RCW 34.12.035

State patrol disciplinary hearings and decertification hearings.

The chief administrative law judge shall designate an administrative law judge with subject matter expertise to serve, as the need arises, as presiding officer in:

(1) State patrol disciplinary hearings conducted under RCW 43.43.090; and

(2) Decertification hearings conducted under RCW 43.101.380.

[ 2021 c 323 s 18; 1984 c 141 s 6.]